Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 37.3 Child Safe Zones

11-37.3-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Employee” means an individual hired directly by the entity; a contractual employee of the entity; an individual hired by a third party who has contracted with the entity; an independent contractor of the entity; or a volunteer of the entity.

“Child Safe Zone” means the following entities:

Any private, municipal, county, or state fair or carnival;

Any children’s arcade, amusement center having coin-or token-operated devices for entertainment, movie theatre, or facilities providing programs or services intended primarily for minors;

A public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school, child care facility, or public library:

Any place intended primarily for use by minors including, but not limited to, a playground, a children’s play area, recreational or sport-related activity area, a swimming or wading pool, or a beach; and

Any healthcare facility intended primarily for minors.

“Minor” means a person under the age of eighteen (18) years old.

“Offender” means a person who is, or is required to be, registered as a sex offender in this state or any other jurisdiction and whose victim was a minor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 506, § 1.

11-37.3-2.
Prohibition from employment.

Any entity that is a child safe zone is prohibited from employing a person who is an offender.

The individual who made the final hiring decision for an entity that is a child safe zone that knowingly employs an offender as prohibited in §

11-37.3-3(a)

shall be subject to a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the offender is employed.

Any offender who knowingly misrepresents or omits his or her sex offender registration status to obtain employment in a child safe zone shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 506, § 1.

11-37.3-3.
Prohibition from ownership or operation.

Any offender is prohibited from owning or operating an entity that is a child safe zone. This prohibition shall not apply to any offender who owned or operated an entity that is a child safe zone prior to August 1, 2014.

Any offender who knowingly owns or operates an entity that is a child safe zone shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 506, § 1.

11-37.3-4.
Immunity from liability.

An entity that is a child safe zone that declines to hire, or declines to continue an offender’s employment, on the basis of the employment prohibition in §

11-37.3-2(a)

shall not be liable for civil damages or subject to any claim, demand, cause of action, or proceeding of any nature as a result of the prohibition.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 506, § 1.